oo/vimspell/eo.aff
SFX P Y 10
SFX P a en a
SFX P 0 n [eijou]
SFX P aj e aj
SFX P 0 j [au]
SFX P 0 jn [au]
SFX P 0 e [^ajeou]
SFX P 0 a [^ajeou]
SFX P 0 aj [^ajeou]
SFX P 0 ajn [^ajeou]
SFX P 0 an [^ajeou]
SFX Q Y 431
SFX Q 0 ĝi i
SFX Q 0 ĝas i
SFX Q 0 ĝis i
SFX Q 0 ĝos i
SFX Q 0 ĝus i
SFX Q 0 ĝu i
SFX Q 0 ĝinta i
SFX Q 0 ĝintaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝintajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝintan i
SFX Q 0 ĝinte i
SFX Q 0 ĝint’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝint' i
SFX Q 0 ĝinto i
SFX Q 0 ĝintoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝintojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝinton i
SFX Q 0 ĝanta i
SFX Q 0 ĝantaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝantajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝantan i
SFX Q 0 ĝante i
SFX Q 0 ĝant’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝant' i
SFX Q 0 ĝanto i
SFX Q 0 ĝantoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝantojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝanton i
SFX Q 0 ĝonta i
SFX Q 0 ĝontaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝontajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝontan i
SFX Q 0 ĝonte i
SFX Q 0 ĝont’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝont' i
SFX Q 0 ĝonto i
SFX Q 0 ĝontoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝontojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝonton i
SFX Q 0 ĝintina i
SFX Q 0 ĝintinaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝintinajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝintinan i
SFX Q 0 ĝintin’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝintin' i
SFX Q 0 ĝintino i
SFX Q 0 ĝintinoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝintinojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝintinon i
SFX Q 0 ĝantina i
SFX Q 0 ĝantinaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝantinajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝantinan i
SFX Q 0 ĝantin’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝantin' i
SFX Q 0 ĝantino i
SFX Q 0 ĝantinoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝantinojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝantinon i
SFX Q 0 ĝontina i
SFX Q 0 ĝontinaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝontinajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝontinan i
SFX Q 0 ĝontin’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝontin' i
SFX Q 0 ĝontino i
SFX Q 0 ĝontinoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝontinojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝontinon i
SFX Q 0 ĝa i
SFX Q 0 ĝaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝan i
SFX Q 0 ĝe i
SFX Q 0 ĝ’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝ' i
SFX Q 0 ĝo i
SFX Q 0 ĝoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝon i
SFX Q 0 ĝema i
SFX Q 0 ĝemaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝemajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝeman i
SFX Q 0 ĝeme i
SFX Q 0 ĝem’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝem' i
SFX Q 0 ĝemo i
SFX Q 0 ĝemoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝemojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝemon i
SFX Q 0 ĝada i
SFX Q 0 ĝadaj i
SFX Q 0 ĝadajn i
SFX Q 0 ĝadan i
SFX Q 0 ĝade i
SFX Q 0 ĝad’ i
SFX Q 0 ĝad' i
SFX Q 0 ĝado i
SFX Q 0 ĝadoj i
SFX Q 0 ĝadojn i
SFX Q 0 ĝadon i
SFX Q 0 ĝadi i
SFX Q 0 ĝadas i
SFX Q 0 ĝadis i
SFX Q 0 ĝados i
SFX Q 0 ĝadus i
SFX Q 0 ĝadu i
SFX Q u iĝi u
SFX Q u iĝas u
SFX Q u iĝis u
SFX Q u iĝos u
SFX Q u iĝus u
SFX Q u iĝu u
SFX Q u iĝinta u
SFX Q u iĝintaj u
SFX Q u iĝintajn u
SFX Q u iĝintan u
SFX Q u iĝinte u
SFX Q u iĝint’ u
SFX Q u iĝint' u
SFX Q u iĝinto u
SFX Q u iĝintoj u
SFX Q u iĝintojn u
SFX Q u iĝinton u
SFX Q u iĝanta u
SFX Q u iĝantaj u
SFX Q u iĝantajn u
SFX Q u iĝantan u
SFX Q u iĝante u
SFX Q u iĝant’ u
SFX Q u iĝant' u
SFX Q u iĝanto u
SFX Q u iĝantoj u
SFX Q u iĝantojn u
SFX Q u iĝanton u
SFX Q u iĝonta u
SFX Q u iĝontaj u
SFX Q u iĝontajn u
SFX Q u iĝontan u
SFX Q u iĝonte u
SFX Q u iĝont’ u
SFX Q u iĝont' u
SFX Q u iĝonto u
SFX Q u iĝontoj u
SFX Q u iĝontojn u
SFX Q u iĝonton u
SFX Q u iĝintina u
SFX Q u iĝintinaj u
SFX Q u iĝintinajn u
SFX Q u iĝintinan u
SFX Q u iĝintin’ u
SFX Q u iĝintin' u
SFX Q u iĝintino u
SFX Q u iĝintinoj u
SFX Q u iĝintinojn u
SFX Q u iĝintinon u
SFX Q u iĝantina u
SFX Q u iĝantinaj u
SFX Q u iĝantinajn u
SFX Q u iĝantinan u
SFX Q u iĝantin’ u
SFX Q u iĝantin' u
SFX Q u iĝantino u
SFX Q u iĝantinoj u
SFX Q u iĝantinojn u
SFX Q u iĝantinon u
SFX Q u iĝontina u
SFX Q u iĝontinaj u
SFX Q u iĝontinajn u
SFX Q u iĝontinan u
SFX Q u iĝontin’ u
SFX Q u iĝontin' u
SFX Q u iĝontino u
SFX Q u iĝontinoj u
SFX Q u iĝontinojn u
SFX Q u iĝontinon u
SFX Q u iĝa u
SFX Q u iĝaj u
SFX Q u iĝajn u
SFX Q u iĝan u
SFX Q u iĝe u
SFX Q u iĝ’ u
SFX Q u iĝ' u
SFX Q u iĝo u
SFX Q u iĝoj u
SFX Q u iĝojn u
SFX Q u iĝon u
SFX Q u iĝema u
SFX Q u iĝemaj u
SFX Q u iĝemajn u
SFX Q u iĝeman u
SFX Q u iĝeme u
SFX Q u iĝem’ u
SFX Q u iĝem' u
SFX Q u iĝemo u
SFX Q u iĝemoj u
SFX Q u iĝemojn u
SFX Q u iĝemon u
SFX Q u iĝada u
SFX Q u iĝadaj u
SFX Q u iĝadajn u
SFX Q u iĝadan u
SFX Q u iĝad’ u
SFX Q u iĝad' u
SFX Q u iĝado u
SFX Q u iĝadoj u
SFX Q u iĝadojn u
SFX Q u iĝadon u
SFX Q u iĝadi u
SFX Q u iĝadas u
SFX Q u iĝadis u
SFX Q u iĝados u
SFX Q u iĝadus u
SFX Q u iĝadu u
SFX Q a iĝi a
SFX Q a iĝas a
SFX Q a iĝis a
SFX Q a iĝos a
SFX Q a iĝus a
SFX Q a iĝu a
SFX Q a iĝinta a
SFX Q a iĝintaj a
SFX Q a iĝintajn a
SFX Q a iĝintan a
SFX Q a iĝinte a
SFX Q a iĝint’ a
SFX Q a iĝint' a
SFX Q a iĝinto a
SFX Q a iĝintoj a
SFX Q a iĝintojn a
SFX Q a iĝinton a
SFX Q a iĝanta a
SFX Q a iĝantaj a
SFX Q a iĝantajn a
SFX Q a iĝantan a
SFX Q a iĝante a
SFX Q a iĝant’ a
SFX Q a iĝant' a
SFX Q a iĝanto a
SFX Q a iĝantoj a
SFX Q a iĝantojn a
SFX Q a iĝanton a
SFX Q a iĝonta a
SFX Q a iĝontaj a
SFX Q a iĝontajn a
SFX Q a iĝontan a
SFX Q a iĝonte a
SFX Q a iĝont’ a
SFX Q a iĝont' a
SFX Q a iĝonto a
SFX Q a iĝontoj a
SFX Q a iĝontojn a
SFX Q a iĝonton a
SFX Q a iĝintina a
SFX Q a iĝintinaj a
SFX Q a iĝintinajn a
SFX Q a iĝintinan a
SFX Q a iĝintin’ a
SFX Q a iĝintin' a
SFX Q a iĝintino a
SFX Q a iĝintinoj a
SFX Q a iĝintinojn a
SFX Q a iĝintinon a
SFX Q a iĝantina a
SFX Q a iĝantinaj a
SFX Q a iĝantinajn a
SFX Q a iĝantinan a
SFX Q a iĝantin’ a
SFX Q a iĝantin' a
SFX Q a iĝantino a
SFX Q a iĝantinoj a
SFX Q a iĝantinojn a
SFX Q a iĝantinon a
SFX Q a iĝontina a
SFX Q a iĝontinaj a
SFX Q a iĝontinajn a
SFX Q a iĝontinan a
SFX Q a iĝontin’ a
SFX Q a iĝontin' a
SFX Q a iĝontino a
SFX Q a iĝontinoj a
SFX Q a iĝontinojn a
SFX Q a iĝontinon a
SFX Q a iĝa a
SFX Q a iĝaj a
SFX Q a iĝajn a
SFX Q a iĝan a
SFX Q a iĝe a
SFX Q a iĝ’ a
SFX Q a iĝ' a
SFX Q a iĝo a
SFX Q a iĝoj a
SFX Q a iĝojn a
SFX Q a iĝon a
SFX Q a iĝema a
SFX Q a iĝemaj a
SFX Q a iĝemajn a
SFX Q a iĝeman a
SFX Q a iĝeme a
SFX Q a iĝem’ a
SFX Q a iĝem' a
SFX Q a iĝemo a
SFX Q a iĝemoj a
SFX Q a iĝemojn a
SFX Q a iĝemon a
SFX Q a iĝada a
SFX Q a iĝadaj a
SFX Q a iĝadajn a
SFX Q a iĝadan a
SFX Q a iĝade a
SFX Q a iĝad’ a
SFX Q a iĝad' a
SFX Q a iĝado a
SFX Q a iĝadoj a
SFX Q a iĝadojn a
SFX Q a iĝadon a
SFX Q a iĝadi a
SFX Q a iĝadas a
SFX Q a iĝadis a
SFX Q a iĝados a
SFX Q a iĝadus a
SFX Q a iĝadu a
SFX Q o iĝi o
SFX Q o iĝas o
SFX Q o iĝis o
SFX Q o iĝos o
SFX Q o iĝus o
SFX Q o iĝu o
SFX Q o iĝinta o
SFX Q o iĝintaj o
SFX Q o iĝintajn o
SFX Q o iĝintan o
SFX Q o iĝinte o
SFX Q o iĝint’ o
SFX Q o iĝint' o
SFX Q o iĝinto o
SFX Q o iĝintoj o
SFX Q o iĝintojn o
SFX Q o iĝinton o
SFX Q o iĝanta o
SFX Q o iĝantaj o
SFX Q o iĝantajn o
SFX Q o iĝantan o
SFX Q o iĝante o
SFX Q o iĝant’ o
SFX Q o iĝant' o
SFX Q o iĝanto o
SFX Q o iĝantoj o
SFX Q o iĝantojn o
SFX Q o iĝanton o
SFX Q o iĝonta o
SFX Q o iĝontaj o
SFX Q o iĝontajn o
SFX Q o iĝontan o
SFX Q o iĝonte o
SFX Q o iĝont’ o
SFX Q o iĝont' o
SFX Q o iĝonto o
SFX Q o iĝontoj o
SFX Q o iĝontojn o
SFX Q o iĝonton o
SFX Q o iĝintina o
SFX Q o iĝintinaj o
SFX Q o iĝintinajn o
SFX Q o iĝintinan o
SFX Q o iĝintin’ o
SFX Q o iĝintin' o
SFX Q o iĝintino o
SFX Q o iĝintinoj o
SFX Q o iĝintinojn o
SFX Q o iĝintinon o
SFX Q o iĝantina o
SFX Q o iĝantinaj o
SFX Q o iĝantinajn o
SFX Q o iĝantinan o
SFX Q o iĝantin’ o
SFX Q o iĝantin' o
SFX Q o iĝantino o
SFX Q o iĝantinoj o
SFX Q o iĝantinojn o
SFX Q o iĝantinon o
SFX Q o iĝontina o
SFX Q o iĝontinaj o
SFX Q o iĝontinajn o
SFX Q o iĝontinan o
SFX Q o iĝontin’ o
SFX Q o iĝontin' o
SFX Q o iĝontino o
SFX Q o iĝontinoj o
SFX Q o iĝontinojn o
SFX Q o iĝontinon o
SFX Q o iĝa o
SFX Q o iĝaj o
SFX Q o iĝajn o
SFX Q o iĝan o
SFX Q o iĝe o
SFX Q o iĝ’ o
SFX Q o iĝ' o
SFX Q o iĝo o
SFX Q o iĝoj o
SFX Q o iĝojn o
SFX Q o iĝon o
SFX Q o iĝema o
SFX Q o iĝemaj o
SFX Q o iĝemajn o
SFX Q o iĝeman o
SFX Q o iĝeme o
SFX Q o iĝem’ o
SFX Q o iĝem' o
SFX Q o iĝemo o
SFX Q o iĝemoj o
SFX Q o iĝemojn o
SFX Q o iĝemon o
SFX Q o iĝada o
SFX Q o iĝadaj o
SFX Q o iĝadajn o
SFX Q o iĝadan o
SFX Q o iĝade o
SFX Q o iĝad’ o
SFX Q o iĝad' o
SFX Q o iĝado o
SFX Q o iĝadoj o
SFX Q o iĝadojn o
SFX Q o iĝadon o
SFX Q o iĝadi o
SFX Q o iĝadas o
SFX Q o iĝadis o
SFX Q o iĝados o
SFX Q o iĝadus o
SFX Q o iĝadu o
