oo/vimspell/eo.dic
aĉi/ACGOQUVY
adicii/AOQT
adopti/AOQTB
aera/AsP
aflikti/AFOQT
agiti/LQTBO
agnoski/AGMOQTB
akcepti/BDGMTQY
akumuli/AJLQTBY
aleksandriana/FGIQ
alianci/AOQTBW
alilingva/CGPQW
aliu/P?
alkonduki/AOQT
alporda/AQ?
alta/ACLMOPUY
altena/AOQ
amuzi/ACLOTQSY
anemii/AOQT
angla/CPQY
ankri/MTQ
antaŭenmovi/AQV
antaŭkonsenti/AOQT
Antiloj/P
Apeninoj/P
apliki/ABOQTYy
apuda/AGPQVX
arbara/AeOPu
arda/AeGQVY
armi/BMOQT
asfalta/AOP
askia/AGLPY
asocii/AOQTBYy
aŭtomato/GOQ
Bahamoj/P
balanci/AkLQOT
banta/AGOQ
barela/AOQSJ
bategi/AROQT
bazi/OQT
belga/FGQ
blovi/aAefkLlOQTvz÷
bogefrata/AGQ
bonhumora/ACGMOQ
branĉa/AGQs
brusta/AOPY
bruta/ACGJKOQSUY
buklu/MQT
burĝa/EMCQ
ĉagreni/AOQT
ĉebrusta/AOP
celkonforma/ACGQ
centri/ACGJOQSTUZ
ĉiela/AOPUWX
ĉie/P
ĉifi/QTBY
cikla/AGNnQ
ĉina/CFGQY
ci/P
ĉirkaŭa/AGOPXY
ĉiu/P
damni/AOTQ
dati/AOQT
definitiva/EGQ
deklini/TQ
dekstra/AEMOUP
dekstraflanka/AMP
demona/AGOQZ
dependa/CEGOQrs
desegni/ALSOQTY
determini/LOQSTZ
deturni/OTQ
difini/hLOQRTy[
direktu/AafQT
distanca/AGOQV
diversprotokolaj/P
diversrilataj/P
doma/AOPW
dorlota/AQ
dungi/AMQT
eduki/FJLOQRST
eĥi/AOQRT
ekokupi/AOQT
eksplicita/AGQ
ekstera/AOJGPQUXY
eksterlanda/AOPUW
ekzalti/AOQTBU
ela/AGQX
elparoli/AOQT
eltera/AGQ
embuski/AGJOQUV
ena/AGQOPXY
enaŭta/AGQ
enkanona/AGQ
enpensa/AGQ
enŝovi/AORQT
enuja/AGQ
esperantlingva/AGPQW
estona/CFGQY
eŭropana/GQ
faldi/AMORQTY
fandi/AGHJOQSTY
fendeti/AOQT
fermi/AMOLQTY
fibra/ACQ
fiksi/AaLMQRT[
Filipinoj/P
firma/ACGMQY
fondi/OQRTY
fora/ACGOPQVXY
forskui/QT
frakasi/AOQTBz
franca/CFPQSYZ
fremda/ACGMQUVY
frostvundi/AOQT
frua/ACGMPQVY
fumi/AOULQTJHY
gaja/CEmGQV
gelateno/AOQ
gemaljunuloj/KP
genui/AGOQV
germana/CFPQSYZ
gesolaj/P
ĝi/P
ĝisranda/AGOQ
Gnus/P
graveda/ACGOQ
halucini/AOQTUVY
hindo/CFGQY
horizontala/ACOQ
ia/APO
idioto/CGFQYZ
ili/P
impliki/AMOQRTY
indigni/ADGkOQV
informo/JQS
instalu/AMOQRT
interkompreni/ALQTY
interpaca/AGOQ
italo/CFGQY
iu/P
ĵeto/OQY
kadavro/FGJQY
kalveta/ACGOQY
kapabla/CEGMQsU
karamela/AOQ
kaŭterizi/QT
kelkiuj/P
kia/APO
kimro/CFGQY
kiu/P
klero/GQZ
kolonii/QWT
komenci/ROQTY
Komoroj/P
komponi/AOMQSTBY
komunii/AOQT
koneksa/CEGOQVY
konfuzeti/AOQTY
konsili/ADKSOQWT
konstipi/AOQT
kontraŭi/COQUTY
kontraŭ/P
konvinki/AMQTy
korpa/AlsGQv
krei/AMORQTBY
kripla/ACGQUY
kruci/AGOQSY
kulpi/GOQUV
kuraĝi/GOQMUT
lamena/AKGOQ
latina/CEPSUZY
lernu/AGlkMQRT÷
limi/AGOQTz
li/P
Lisp/P
lista/ANnP
liva/AOP
magra/AGQ
makuli/AQOT
Maldivoj/P
malfondi/AROQT
malregula/GQY
marasmo/AOQ
matura/ACGQUV
mergi/AMOQT
meza/AOPU
minimuma/ACGOQSZ
mi/P
misvoji/AGOQV
modesta/ACGMOQUY
monopola/AGOQ
movebla/EGQRO
multiuj/P
narkoti/ASCQTOYZ
nenia/AOCGPQY
neniu/P
ni/P
nokto/OQU
norda/AOPSUW
Nord-Eŭropa/P
nordeŭropa/PAW
nordokcidenta/APW
nordorienta/APW
novjara/AQ
obtuza/ACLGQ
oftega/ACGMVQY
okcidenta/BCEPq
Okcident-Eŭropa/P
okcidenteŭropa/PAW
okcidentlingva/APW
oni/P
ordi/AGOMQBV
orienta/APSWY
Orient-Eŭropa/P
orienteŭropa/PAW
orumi/AJQT
pacienci/AGMOQV
paralizi/GOQUT
partiana/CFQ
peceta/AGOQ
percepti/AOQTYy
persisti/ACGJOQV
pinti/GQV
plia/AGMOPQVXY
plimulta/GOMQ
pluraj/P
pola/CFGPQY
polui/AQT
posti/AOQVXY
premsufoki/ATQ
privata/ACGMQUY
profunda/EMP
prononci/AOQTUy
pruso/FGQ
pulvoro/ACGLOQ
rajti/ACOQUVY
ravina/AGOQ
rea/AP
registri/ADGOQRT
rekta/ACMOPV
rezervi/ABQSJOTHY
rilati/kGOQrV
riveli/ALOQTY
ruino/AGOQY
rusa/CPQSYZ
saĝo/CGMOQUY
samkia/AP
ŝargi/ARMOLQTH
scii/BDOQTY
Sejŝeloj/P
sena/AGQX
senbalasta/AGQ
senĉena/AGQ
sendia/AGQU
senefika/AGQ
senfebra/AGQ
senfolia/AGQ
sengarda/AGQ
sengusta/AQ
senhonta/AGQU
seninflua/AGQ
senkaraktera/AGQ
senkolora/AGQ
senkosta/AGQ
senlaca/AGQ
senmastra/AGQ
senminerala/AQV
senmuskola/AGQ
senofica/AGQ
senorda/AGQ
senpersona/AGQ
senpotenca/AGQ
senrezulta/ACGQ
senŝela/AGQ
senŝnura/AGQ
sensuka/AGQ
senti/ALGOBQT
senvitra/AGQ
senvuala/AGQ
sidi/BGJjOQV
si/P
ŝi/P
ŝiri/AdflOQTYz
slavo/FGQS
sola/AGJOQSUV
soporo/AOQ?
spika/AOQ
stari/ABOLGQVJ
sterni/AQTYz
studento/FKQ
submara/AGQS
suda/AOPUW
Sud-Eŭropa/P
sudeŭropa/PAW
sudokcidenta/APW
sudorienta/APW
sudpolusa/AP
sufoki/AQTO
supra/AMP
surbreta/AGQ
surbrusta/APY
surgenua/APQ
surgrunda/AGQ
surstrata/AP
surtera/AGPQ
svati/SQT
tajo/CFGQY
tena/AHJQS
tia/AOPY
tima/DGMQ
tiu/P
toksi/ACQOT
traa/AGPX
trafi/MQTy
transa/AGLMOPQUXY
transfiguri/QT
trapiki/LTQ
trompi/ABLOSQTUY
turmenti/lQT
tutminuskla/ACGQY
unueca/EGMOQ
unuj/P
urbo/cOPW[_
uzbeko/CFGQY
varmo/AGOQ^
vendi/AORQSTJ
verŝu/alpQTtvYz^
vidi/GkQRT
vi/P
vira/ACKOQU
volvi/AjlMOQroTvYz
zipi/AMOQT
